Materials for lyx workshop/LyX.app/Contents/Resources/dicts/ca_XV.dic
abastonejadeta/1,2
Abasts/1,2,3
abjuracionusca/1,2
ablactacionetes/2
aborronadeta/1,2
aborronadoruces/2
abrogacionusca/1,2
abrotonites/2
abuliusca/1,2
abundantots/2
acanelladeta/1,2
acantínees/1,2
acatador/1,2
acceleradet/1,2
aceradota/1,2
acetolàctiques/2
acolladíssim/1,2
acomodet/1,2
acordeonista/1,2
acostumadiça/1,2
acristianadot/1,2
acrópeta/1,2
actuacioneta/1,2
acusmàtics/2
adenina/1,2
adicionalusc/1,2
adjudicacioneta/1,2
adoptives/2
adornadet/1,2
adveradets/2
adversitat/1,2
afaníptera/1,2
afanític/1,2
afiliadíssima/1,2
afillat/1,2
afonadeta/1,2
aforcadots/2
agamelladíssim/1,2
agarradotes/2
agnació/1,2
agoreriarra/1,2
agredidíssim/1,2
agridíssims/2
agudíssim/1,2
aiguasal/1,2
aixardoruç/1,2
ajusticiament/1,2
alardejadet/1,2
albicòrnea/1,2
alçador/1,2
alcoyanaça/1,2
aldehídica/1,2
alfarrassades/2
alfarrasuç/1,2
alitrencadíssima/1,2
allancejadíssima/1,2
almagasener/1,2
almescadíssimes/2
aloteris/1,2
alternances/2
alvanç/1,2
amant/1,2
amarrotadiua/1,2
americanarros/2
amfiteatre/1,2
amordaçadeta/1,2
amorosíssim/1,2
anacoretes/2
anada/1,2
anegada/1,2
anellejada/1,2
anheladora/1,2
animalisadíssima/1,2
Antananarivo/1,2,3
antiàcit/1,2
antifeministe/1,2
antimonopolismes/2
antitòxic/1,2
anualitat/1,2
apagador/1,2
apartadíssim/1,2
apelfadet/1,2
apilotadíssimes/2
aplegadíssima/1,2
apoquidot/1,2
apostatadiu/1,2
aprovacions/2
apunyalador/1,2
aranyes/2
arcabussejadiu/1,2
argentoses/2
argumentatiu/1,2
arquejadors/2
arraïlorra/1,2
arrels/2
arrepenediíssima/1,2
Arroita/2
arrossegadet/1,2
articulats/2
artistusc/1,2
aspergit/1,2
aspersori/1,2
assercioneta/1,2
assercionota/1,2
assolejat/1,2
assorradius/2
astrolatria/1,2
asuavadeta/1,2
atassalladiu/1,2
atencionals/2
atestadíssima/1,2
atòmic/1,2
atribuïdor/1,2
atropellet/1,2
aüixadíssima/1,2
autobuset/1,2
autorisable/1,2
aveïnadots/2
averiadiu/1,2
axiomes/2
eclecticisme/1,2
ectàsies/2
edificadíssima/1,2
efectot/1,2
eficaçusc/1,2
eixancades/2
eixarmentadeta/1,2
elchana/1,2
eleccioniua/1,2
eliminacionusca/1,2
eliminadius/2
embanderadot/1,2
embarassadíssims/2
emblanquidiu/1,2
emblanquinadora/1,2
embovat/1,2
embravida/1,2
emfatisadot/1,2
emídit/1,2
emocionable/1,2
emocionat/1,2
emparradiu/1,2
empastadots/2
empindongadíssima/1,2
empirisme/1,2
empresusca/1,2
empulgonadiu/1,2
encalladota/1,2
encalostradius/2
encapotadeta/1,2
encapuchadetes/2
encàustica/1,2
encefalologia/1,2
encistelladota/1,2
enclavilladetes/2
encorbadota/1,2
encordadiues/2
encurenyadot/1,2
endentadíssima/1,2
endossada/1,2
endozoica/1,2
enfeltridet/1,2
enfeudadotes/2
enfuridíssim/1,2
engafetadius/2
engolidiu/1,2
engordidíssims/2
enjolioladiu/1,2
enjoyelladius/2
ennegridiua/1,2
enològiques/2
enriquidot/1,2
enroladeta/1,2
enselladiua/1,2
ensenyorejadiues/2
entaranyinadiua/1,2
entaulelladíssimes/2
entonadíssima/1,2
entorpidíssims/2
entrenyorat/1,2
entretancadet/1,2
enumeradet/1,2
envàs/1,2
envinadeta/1,2
enyoradiu/1,2
epilogal/1,2
episperma/1,2
era/1,2
erogat/1,2
ertet/1,2
escalonadeta/1,2
escapadot/1,2
escarificadíssims/2
escissionuces/2
escolaruça/1,2
escopinyats/2
esculleres/2
esgarrador/1,2
esguitosa/1,2
espardalisadetes/2
espasmós/1,2
espillot/1,2
espiritualistuç/1,2
esquerruscs/2
estabilisadot/1,2
estanqueriua/1,2
estatuota/1,2
Estivella/1,2,3
estoquejadíssima/1,2
estructuralota/1,2
estudiat/1,2
euros/2
evadidiua/1,2
excèntrics/2
exceptuadíssim/1,2
exocarpis/2
exorcisadet/1,2
extàtics/2
extensora/1,2
harems/2
harmonisadot/1,2
hexagonalusc/1,2
hexàpoda/1,2
historicarra/1,2
hivernaluços/2
humanaç/1,2
humectació/1,2
illegalisadota/1,2
ilusionàries/2
imparisilàbic/1,2
imperceptible/1,2
improperosa/1,2
impunitat/1,2
incomodorra/1,2
incongruències/2
indicada/1,2
indiracionarra/1,2
inextensa/1,2
infecunts/2
ingeniadeta/1,2
inhibits/2
insaciabilitat/1,2
insert/1,2
insubordinadot/1,2
integralusca/1,2
internadíssim/1,2
intervertebral/1,2
inventadíssim/1,2
ionisades/2
isobàric/1,2
obenc/1,2
observadora/1,2
obtusipene/1,2
ocupacionorra/1,2
ofrenadiues/2
ombradiç/1,2
ontòlec/1,2
optadet/1,2
ordenament/1,2
originalarra/1,2
ortoèdrics/2
ou/1,2
ouius/2
ulladaça/1,2
ungladiua/1,2
urgidots/2
